Washington statutes.
RCW 13.06.050

Conditions for receiving state funds—Criteria for distribution of funds.

No county shall be entitled to receive any state funds provided by this chapter until its application and plan are approved, and unless and until the minimum standards prescribed by the department of children, youth, and families are complied with and then only on such terms as are set forth in this section. In addition, any county making application for state funds under this chapter that also operates a juvenile detention facility must have standards of operations in place that include: Intake and admissions, medical and health care, communication, correspondence, visiting and telephone use, security and control, sanitation and hygiene, juvenile rights, rules and discipline, property, juvenile records, safety and emergency procedures, programming, release and transfer, training and staff development, and food service.

(1) The distribution of funds to a county or a group of counties shall be based on criteria including but not limited to the county's per capita income, regional or county at-risk populations, juvenile crime or arrest rates, rates of poverty, size of racial minority populations, existing programs, and the effectiveness and efficiency of consolidating local programs towards reducing commitments to state correctional facilities for offenders whose standard range disposition does not include commitment of the offender to the department and reducing reliance on other traditional departmental services.

(2) The secretary of children, youth, and families will reimburse a county upon presentation and approval of a valid claim pursuant to the provisions of this chapter based on actual performance in meeting the terms and conditions of the approved plan and contract. Funds received by participating counties under this chapter shall not be used to replace local funds for existing programs.

[ 2020 c 262 s 2; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 719; 1993 c 415 s 7; (2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 910 expired June 30, 2011); 1983 c 191 s 5; 1979 c 151 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 307 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 198 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 165 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 165 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Expiration date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 910: "Section 910 of this act expires June 30, 2011." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 956.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 4, 2010]." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 958.]

Intent—1993 c 415: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 307: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 307 s 3.]

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 198: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 198 s 3.]